Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1385.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 40, chapter 2, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 40-207, to read: START_STATUTE40-207. Renewable energy resource; electric distribution utilities; definition A. On or before January 1, 2036, electric distribution utilities in this state shall generate at least fifty percent of their electricity from a renewable energy resource. B. For the purposes of this section, "renewable energy resource": 1. Means an energy resource that is self-replenishing by a natural, ongoing process. 2. Includes any of the following: (a) Solar energy. (b) Wind energy. (c) Geothermal energy. (d) Hydropower energy. (e) Biofuel energy. END_STATUTE